Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Department of Transportation, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the following amounts,  for the
following purposes:
(1) Debt service ..........................  $ 52,729,158
(2) Project delivery and
support.................................. $ 171,678
(3) Driver and motor
vehicle services ..................... $ 562,018
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts and fed-
eral funds received as reimbursement from the United States Department  of Transportation,
but excluding lottery  funds and federal funds not described in this section, collected or re-
ceived by the Department of Transportation, for the following purposes:
(1) Capital improvement............. $ 18,478,963
(2) Maintenance.......................... $ 602,795,383
(3) Project delivery and
support..................................  $ 2,323,682,560
(4) Interstate bridge
replacement ..........................  $ 425,227,367
(5) Local government program ... $ 414,818,962
(6) Driver and motor vehicle
services ................................. $ 314,924,074
(7) State Board of Towing .......... $ 663,143
(8) Commerce and compliance ... $ 111,202,621
(9) Policy, data and analysis ...... $ 191,753,836
(10) Public transportation............ $ 361,060,723
(11) Department of Transportation
administrative services ......... $ 264,500,977
Enrolled Senate Bill 5541 (SB 5541-A) Page 1
(12) Finance and budget............... $ 88,279,582
(13) Debt service .......................... $ 473,430,820
(14) Oregon Transportation
Infrastructure Fund,
wildlife corridor projects ..... $ 5,500,000
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from federal funds other than those described  in section 2 of this 2025 Act, col-
lected or received by the Department of Transportation, for the following purposes:
(1) Driver and motor
vehicle services ..................... $ 32,710,971
(2) Commerce and compliance ... $ 17,342,776
(3) Policy, data and analysis ...... $ 5,912,961
(4) Public transportation............ $ 151,641,163
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$143,579,808 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the  maximum limit for
payment of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the  Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to the Department of Transportation for debt service.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$1,109,618 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from lottery moneys  allocated from the Veterans’ Services Fund es-
tablished under ORS 406.140 to the Department  of Veterans’ Affairs and transferred to the
Department of Transportation for veteran transit services.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$19,000,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Department of Transportation from American  Rescue Plan Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services and  transferred to the Department of Transportation, for the
Newberg-Dundee Bypass Project.
SECTION 7. For the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, expenditures  by the Department
of Transportation from federal funds for debt service  on Build America Bonds are not lim-
ited.
SECTION 8. For the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, expenditures  by the Department
of Transportation from the Oregon  Transportation Infrastructure Fund established under
ORS 367.015 for debt service and for internally reimbursed expenditures are not limited.
SECTION 9. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5541 (SB 5541-A) Page 2
Passed by Senate June 25, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 27, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5541 (SB 5541-A) Page 3